Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Chapter 20. Alaska Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

Cross references. —

For violation of provisions of this chapter relating to labeling or advertising as an unlawful trade practice, see AS

45.50.471(b)

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Health and Social Services has the authority to regulate the sanitary practices of canneries even though the products manufactured in the canneries are solely for export to a foreign country.
1974 Op. Att’y Gen. No. 3 (Jan. 23), withdrawing opinion of June 21, 1971.

Collateral references. —

What is a “drug,” “device,” and “new drug” within the definitions of these terms in § 201(g)(1), (h), and (p) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act as amended (21 USC § 321(g)(1), (h), and (p)). 3 ALR Fed. 843; 127 ALR Fed. 141; 129 ALR Fed. 343; 133 ALR Fed. 229.